Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-244
All-lines insurer; class of insurance; annual statement; premiums; how accounted for.

Each line of insurance written by an all-lines insurer which is included in the life insurance class of insurance or the property and liability class of insurance shall be accounted for separately in life and accident and health annual statement blanks and fire and casualty annual statement blanks, respectively. Nothing in this section shall prohibit the writing of combination policy forms by an all-lines insurer combining any line or lines of insurance included in the life insurance class of insurance with any line or lines of insurance included in the property and liability class of insurance, but the allocable and separately stated premiums for each line of insurance shall be accounted for separately according to its classification.

Laws 1979, LB 332, § 3;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 89.